Washington statutes.
RCW 35.44.110

Assessment roll—Objections—Timeliness.

All objections to the confirmation of the assessment roll shall state clearly the grounds of objections. Objections not made within the time and in the manner prescribed in this chapter shall be conclusively presumed to have been waived.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.44.110. Prior: 1929 c 97 s 3, part; 1911 c 98 s 21, part; RRS s 9373, part.]